Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.03
Civil liability;
limitation.

No civil liability for failure to comply with
subdivision (2)(d) of section 28-327 or that portion of subdivision (7) of such section requiring a written certification
that the woman has been informed of her right to review the information referred
to in subdivision (2)(d) of such section may be imposed unless the Department
of Health and Human Services has published and made available the printed
materials at the time the physician or his or her agent is required to inform
the woman of her right to review them.

Laws 1993, LB 110, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 62;

Laws 2009, LB675, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB594, § 13.